Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 22 Developmental Disabilities

40.1-22-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Developmental Disabilities Law.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

23-43.1-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-2; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 1995.

40.1-22-3.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this chapter, or in any order, rule, or regulation made or promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or in the printed forms prepared by the director, unless otherwise expressly stated, or unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Client” means any developmentally disabled adult who is in potential need of, or is receiving, services aimed at alleviating his or her condition of functional dependence.

“Department” means the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Development, education, rehabilitation, and care” means physical development, application of these abilities to meaningful occupations, development of personal and social skills, all of which are directed to the objective of independent living and self-maintenance. Care also includes medical care, surgical attendance, medication, as well as food, clothing, supervision, and maintenance furnished to a resident.

“Director” means the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or his or her designees.

“Facility” means any public or private facility, inpatient rehabilitation center, hospital, institution, or other domiciliary facility, the office of developmental disabilities or any part thereof, equipped to habilitate, on a residential basis, persons who are developmentally disabled and in need of residential care. This shall include any facility maintaining adequate staff and facilities within the state providing in-residence supervision and habilitation and approved by the director upon application of the facility. Included within this definition shall be all institutions and facilities under the control and direction of the director. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to amend or repeal any of the provisions of chapters 17 or 17.4 of title 23, or of chapter 15 of title 40, or of chapter 21 of this title or of chapter 72.1 of title 42. Whenever it shall be brought to the attention of the director that any private facility may not have adequate staff, or facilities as determined by regulations of the director, then the facility shall not be approved for the placement of developmentally disabled adults under the provisions of this chapter.

“Notice” means written notice in as simple and non-technical language as practicable as required by the department, or the court of competent jurisdiction. The notice shall be in writing to the director of the department by registered or certified mail, return receipt required. Notice sent to a client shall also include verbal reading of the written notice by duly authorized agents of the department, and/or court. The agents shall make verified return of the oral notification as well as the written. This requirement of oral notice to anyone alleged to be developmentally disabled shall be required because of the recognized limitation that many retarded and developmentally disabled persons are unable to comprehend written notices.

“Objection.” If an objection is raised it shall be in writing, of a timely nature, and filed with the clerk of the family or district court, a copy of which is to be sent to the director of the department via registered or certified mail, return receipt requested.

“Parent” means the natural, adoptive, foster parent or caretaker of the child.

“Qualified intellectual disability professional (QIDP)” means a person as defined in 42 C.F.R. 483.430, as amended.

“Team” means an interdisciplinary team which includes such professional personnel designated by the director and which shall consist of no less than three (3) persons selected by order of the director, no less than one of whom shall be a licensed physician, no less than one of whom shall be a member of the social work profession, and no less than one of whom shall be a qualified intellectual disability professional (QIDP).

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1971, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-3; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 355, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 243, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 39.

40.1-22-4.
General powers and duties of the director.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is charged with the execution of laws relating to the admission and care of the developmentally disabled.

The director shall be responsible for the facilities in the department and such others as are approved to function under this chapter for the purpose of determining whether the provisions of this law relating to admission and care of developmentally disabled persons are being complied with, and giving such residents of the facilities as may request it, suitable opportunity to converse with him or her or them apart from the officers and attendants thereof. The director shall act with power to investigate the question of developmental disability and condition of any person who is a resident of any institution for the developmentally disabled, public or private, or restrained in his or her liberty by reason of alleged developmental disability at any place within the state, and shall discharge any such person, if in his or her opinion he or she is not developmentally disabled or can be cared for after discharge without serious harm to him or herself or others. For such purposes, the director is empowered to hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, administer oaths to witnesses, examine witnesses under oath, and require the production of any books, documents, papers, or records deemed relevant to the inquiry under investigation. A subpoena issued under this section shall be regulated by civil practice laws and rules.

The director may assign a portion of any state facility, for the holding of religious service, to be used exclusively for the benefit of the patients and employees of the facility, subject to such conditions as may be imposed by the director.

The director may:

Examine all facilities, public and private, licensed by him or her or authorized by law to receive, admit, and care for the developmentally disabled; and

Inquire into their methods of government and management of all persons therein; and

Examine into the condition of all buildings, grounds, and other property connected with the facility, and into all matters relating to its management.

The director may promulgate and adopt such rules and regulations governing the management of the facilities, both public and private, as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter to insure the comfort, promote the welfare, and protect the rights of the residents.

Any patient, or person representing the patient shall be furnished, upon request, all information and reports upon which a director or other resident physician made his or her or their determination or finding that the patient is a developmentally disabled person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-4; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-5.
Construction with other laws.

This chapter shall be read in conjunction with the previously stated authority of the director and the duties of the office of developmental disabilities under chapter 21 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-5; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-6.
Admission as a resident in a facility.

Any person alleged to be developmentally disabled, warranting observation and possible residential care and treatment in a facility, public or private, as herein defined, who is not held to answer presently to a criminal charge may be admitted to and received and retained as a resident in a facility by complying with any one of the following admission procedures applicable to the case:

Voluntary admission; or

Admission on a certificate of one physician and a team evaluation certificate.

The director shall prescribe and furnish forms for use in the procedures for admission under this section, and admission shall be had only upon such forms.

A developmentally disabled person, as herein described in this chapter, shall be admitted to a facility as herein defined, designated by the director, or pursuant to an administrative order authorized by law, or pursuant to an authorization, or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

No member of a team, or any physician signing a certificate for emergency admission, shall be related by blood or marriage to the person applying for the admission of a person alleged to be developmentally disabled or to the person alleged to be developmentally disabled; nor shall he or she be a guardian or conservator of the person; nor shall he or she have any interest, contractually, testamentary, or otherwise (other than reasonable and proper charges for professional services rendered), in or against the estate or assets of the person alleged to be developmentally disabled; nor shall he or she be a manager, trustee, proprietor, officer, stockholder, or have any pecuniary interest, directly, or indirectly, or except as otherwise provided, be a director or resident physician, in any facility to which it is proposed to admit the person.

A certificate, as required by this section, must show that the person is developmentally disabled as herein defined, and unable to function independently, and if required to be made by one examining physician, that the physician made an examination of the person alleged to be developmentally disabled within ten (10) days next before and inclusive of the date of admission unless otherwise herein provided. The date of the certificate shall be the date of the commencement of the examination, and in the event the examination or examinations are conducted separately or over a period of days, then the ten (10) day period above referred to (unless otherwise expressly provided) shall be measured from the date of the commencement of the first examination. The certificate shall contain the reasons upon which the judgment of the physician is based and shall show that the condition of the person examined is such as to require development, education, rehabilitation, and care in a facility as herein defined, and shall contain such other information as the director by rule or regulation shall require.

A developmentally disabled person shall enjoy all the civil and constitutional rights conferred on citizens or residents of the state (as the case may be) by the constitution and laws of the United States and of this state, except as expressly otherwise provided by law.

No person of eighteen (18) years of age or older shall be admitted to, detained in, or returned to a state residential facility against his or her will unless he or she has been adjudicated incompetent, has been admitted on any ten (10) day one physician certificate basis, or as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter.

As soon as reasonably practicable upon the admission as provided by this section of any patient to any facility, the superintendent or official in charge thereof shall inform the client of his or her rights to have a judicial hearing and review, to be represented by counsel and to seek independent professional opinion; and further, pursuant to rules established by the director, each client upon admission shall be given the opportunity to communicate by telephone, or if not possible, by the next expeditious method, with any person.

As to all persons admitted to any facility pursuant to this section, the director may make a request of the superintendent or official in charge of any facility to examine at any time a record of admission which shall contain such information as the director by rule or regulation may require. Similarly, the director may examine records of transfers, discharges, conditional releases, and revocation of conditional releases, as well as other dispositions of cases of clients admitted hereunder.

No requirement shall be made, by rule, regulation, or otherwise, as a condition to admission and retention, that any person applying for admission shall have the legal capacity to contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-6; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 39.

40.1-22-7.
Voluntary admissions and discharges.

Any individual of lawful age, either personally, or on the application of any relative, friend, or attorney with the individual’s consent, must apply, orally or in writing, for voluntary admission to any facility provided for by this chapter seeking care and residence for alleged developmental disability.

In the discretion of the superintendent or other official in charge of the facility, the individual may be retained for a period not exceeding three (3) days after receipt of written notice from the individual of his or her intention or desire to leave the facility. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, no person admitted to any facility as a voluntary client shall be deprived of any civil right solely by reason of admission nor shall admission modify or vary any civil right of the person, including, but not limited to, civil service or merit rating, ranking, and appointment, or rights relating to the granting, forfeiture, or denial of a license, permit, privilege, or benefit pursuant to any law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-7; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-8; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 1995.

40.1-22-9.
Admission upon application of director, relative, or guardian.

Upon the application of the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or his or her designee, or of any relative, next of kin, or legally designated guardian of a person alleged to be developmentally disabled, and in need of immediate care and treatment, the superintendent or other official in charge of any facility may receive the person; provided the application is accompanied by the certificate of one examining physician; provided further, that the person alleged to be developmentally disabled does not object to admission, or that parents, guardian, spouse, or next of kin do not object if under eighteen (18); and provided further, that the need for residential care shall be confirmed by the facility by a team examination within twenty (20) days of admission.

If objection is raised, by the person, or by the parent, guardian, spouse, or next of kin, then the matter shall be heard as provided in §

40.1-22-10

, so far as possible.

If upon examination at the facility by a team the need of the client for residential care and treatment is not confirmed, the client shall be discharged.

If upon examination by a team at the facility the need of the client for residential care and treatment is confirmed and the client agrees to remain in the facility as a voluntary client, then he or she shall be considered a voluntary client as of the date of his or her so agreeing.

If upon examination at the facility the need of the client for residential care and treatment is confirmed and the client, if over eighteen (18), declines or refuses to remain in the facility as a voluntary client, then the certificate of a team supporting the application shall be filed with the facility. The team may be on the staff of any facility as herein defined, but persons on this team shall have no interest, directly or indirectly, in the assets or estate of the person who is mentally retarded, nor shall they be related to the person by blood or marriage. The examination and certification shall be made no later than ten (10) days from the date of the confirmation of the client’s need for hospitalization, care, and treatment at the facility.

From the time of his or her admission under the previous subsection, the retention of the person for residential care and treatment shall be subject to the provisions for notice, hearing, review, and judicial approval of continued retention or transfer and continued retention as provided in this chapter. For the purposes of subsections (d) and (e) of this section, the date of admission of the client shall be deemed to be the date of the second examination and certification.

Failure to obtain the second certificate as required within the period specified shall result in the discharge of client no later than twenty (20) days after his or her original admission to the facility under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-9; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 139; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 111; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 111.

40.1-22-10.
Discharges — Judicial review.

Any resident over eighteen (18) years of age or married residents under eighteen (18), except any resident who is under court-ordered restriction, shall be free to leave any public or private developmental disabilities facility at any time upon giving written or oral notice of the intention to the superintendent or other head of the facility. The superintendent or other head of the facility may restrict the right to leave the facility to normal working hours and weekdays and, in his or her discretion, may require that certain residents give three (3) days’ notice of their intention to leave the facility.

Where persons are required to give three (3) days’ notice of an intention to leave the facility, an examination of the person may be conducted by a team to determine his or her suitability for discharge and to investigate other aspects of his or her case including his or her legal competency and his or her family, home, or community situation to the interest of discharging him or her from the facility.

If, however, the superintendent or other head of the facility determines that discharge of a person who has given three (3) days’ notice would create a likelihood of serious harm to the person himself or herself or to other people by reason of the person’s developmental disability, he or she shall forthwith petition the district court of the judicial district wherein the facility is located to order that the person be further retained as a resident. The superintendent or other head may retain the person until the hearing on the petition has been held.

The court shall cause a notice, as defined in this chapter, of the time and place set for the hearing to be served upon the person and the nearest relative or guardian of the person and the superintendent or other head of the facility. In all hearings, the person shall be represented by legal counsel and may present independent clinical testimony. If the person is found by the court to be indigent, counsel shall be appointed by the court and an independent clinical examination, if requested by counsel for the person, may be provided by the court. The person shall be allowed not less than forty-eight (48) hours after the appearance of counsel on his or her behalf in which to prepare his or her case. The person or his or her representative may request either an open or closed hearing in any court proceedings and the court in its discretion may grant the requests.

If the court finds after the hearing that the discharge of the person would create a likelihood of serious harm to the person himself or herself or to other people by reason of developmental disability, the court shall order that the person be further retained as a resident and the person may not, during the next six-month (6) period, leave the facility except by permission of the superintendent or other head of the facility and no further court action shall be necessary to retain the person during the period. If the court does not so find, it shall order that the person be forthwith discharged.

Any person aggrieved by the decision of a district court order for further residential care under the provisions of this section may appeal the findings and order of the district court de novo to the court having appellate jurisdiction wherein the facility is located. In an appeal to a court under the provisions of this section, the findings and order of the district court may be introduced into evidence by either party. If the appellate court finds after a hearing that discharge of the person would create a likelihood of serious harm to the person him or herself or to other people by reason of developmental disability, the court shall order that the person be further retained as a resident and as such may not, during the next six-month (6) period, leave the facility except by permission of the superintendent or other head of the facility, and no further court order shall be necessary to retain the person during the period.

As the basis for its order the appellate court shall make written findings as to the following:

That the person is developmentally disabled and the evidence upon which this determination is based; and

That, in accordance with the definition of “developmental disability” in

40.1-21-4.3(5)

as indicated by the court, the discharge of the person would create a likelihood of serious harm to the person himself or herself or to other people by reason of the developmental disability and the evidence upon which this determination is based; and

Any other issue or evidence, which the court deems relevant and necessary for inclusion in its findings. If the court finds that the person does not meet the definition of “developmental disability” in chapter 21 of this title such that there does not exist a likelihood of serious harm to the person himself or herself or to other people by reason of the developmental disability, it shall order that the person be forthwith discharged.

If, at the end of any six-month (6) period of retention, the person is still in need of care and treatment, he or she may, if he or she so desires, be admitted or transferred to other care and treatment in the same or another facility. If the person is unwilling to consent to continued residence, he or she shall be discharged; provided, however, that, if the superintendent or other head of the facility determines that the discharge would create a likelihood of serious harm to the person himself or herself or to other people by reason of developmental disability, he or she shall, prior to the expiration of the six-month (6) period, petition the district court which made the earlier order to order, under the same procedures, that the person be further retained as a resident, and the person may not during the next one-year period leave the facility except by permission of the superintendent or other head of the facility and no further court order shall be necessary to retain the person during the period. The order may be renewed by the court for additional one-year periods on petition of the superintendent or other head of the facility under the same conditions and procedures and opportunity for judicial review as above. The superintendent or other head of the facility shall be immune from civil suit for damages for retaining a person and petitioning the court pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Whenever a person before the district court appears to be developmentally disabled and the court determines either that the crime has not been committed or that there is not sufficient cause to believe that the person is guilty thereof, the court may order evaluation procedures as previously provided in this section, or after a hearing as provided in subsections (d) and (e), and in such a case the criminal action shall terminate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-10; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995 ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-11.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-11; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 1995.

40.1-22-12.
Forwarding of client’s letters.

All letters written by clients in any public or private developmental disabilities facility shall be forwarded unopened.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-12; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-13.
Visits.

No public or private developmental disabilities facility shall restrict the visiting of a client by anyone at any time of the day or night; however, in special circumstances when the client is ill or incapacitated and a visit would not be in his or her best interest, visitation may be restricted temporarily during the illness or incapacity when documented in the client’s individualized program plan, as defined in §

40.1-21-4.3(7)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-13; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 10.

40.1-22-14.
Retention of client for more than six (6) months.

In cases other than voluntary admissions, if it is determined that care and treatment for a period in excess of six (6) months is required, and no prior application for a hearing was made by the client or someone in his or her behalf, then to retain a client beyond the period, the official in charge of the facility to which the client was admitted shall notify the client, his or her spouse and nearest relative, if known, and the applicant petitioning for his or her original admission, if available, of the client’s right to a hearing on the issue of his or her continued retention. If no request for a hearing is made within ten (10) days of notification, the client may be retained for an additional six-month (6) period, subject thereafter to similar notifications, at least, annually.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-14; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-22-15.
Hearings.

In the case of a hearing the matter shall be heard as provided in §

40.1-22-10

, so far as possible.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-15; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-22-16.
Discharge.

The director or the superintendent or official in charge of any facility, on having his or her reasons noted on the client’s record, may discharge any client:

Who, in his or her judgment, is substantially improved.

Who, in his or her opinion, is not developmentally disabled.

Who is not substantially improved but whose discharge, in his or her judgment, will not be detrimental to the public welfare or injurious to the client.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 262, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-16; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-17.
Refusal to discharge.

When the official in charge of any facility is unwilling to certify to the discharge of an unimproved client upon request, and so certifies in writing, noting his or her reasons therefor, in the client’s record, he or she shall give a copy thereof to the person applying for the release and to the director.

If provisions for the review of the question of the client’s detention as elsewhere provided in this chapter are not available to the client, then recourse may be had to a justice of the district court for a hearing upon the matter set forth in the record provided for in subsection (a). At a hearing the burden of proving the lack of need of retention for further care and treatment shall be upon the person petitioning for the release of the client. At a hearing the court may enter such an order as the exigencies of the case, as disclosed by the evidence, may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-17; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-18.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-18; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 1995.

40.1-22-19.
Aliens and nonresidents.

The director shall be responsible for the investigation and examination of all alien and nonresident persons who are developmentally disabled in any facility under the jurisdiction of the department of health, department of human services or elsewhere if admitted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and to attend to the deportation or removal of such persons to their respective countries or places of residence.

The director may make reciprocal agreements with other states or political subdivisions thereof to provide for prompt humane return under proper supervision of developmentally disabled residents of other states or political subdivisions thereof.

In the case of nonresidents the director shall cause them to be removed to the state of their residence, except that he or she may defer the action where the removal would cause the developmentally disabled person undue hardship unless the interests of the state and other clients would be materially harmed by the deferment.

The director shall designate such person or persons as deemed necessary to accompany clients, unless it be certified by the director that clients are in a condition to travel alone in safety.

The director in his or her discretion may, upon the request of any developmentally disabled person resident in a facility or upon the written consent of a relative, legal representative, or qualified friend, remove the person to any country, other state, or place in which he or she may properly belong.

For the purposes of this section the director, or his or her duly designated representative acting in his or her behalf in the matter, shall have the power to administer oaths, hold hearings, take testimony, issue subpoenas duces tecum, and subpoena and compel the attendance of witnesses who may have information in respect to the residence of the developmentally disabled person under investigation. Subpoenas issued under this section shall be regulated by civil practice law and rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-19; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 39.

40.1-22-20.
Exclusiveness of this chapter.

Where under any provision of any existing law, except in the case of a person held under criminal process, any person coming within the definition of a developmentally disabled adult as defined in this chapter, shall have recourse to or be dealt with as provided in this chapter, exclusively.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-20; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 139.

40.1-22-21.
State support of poor or indigent clients.

The director may maintain without charge or defray the expense of care and treatment of such poor or indigent persons as are developmentally disabled clients under treatment in accordance with the provisions of this chapter who are residents of this state and proper subjects of state aid, who may have been admitted to any facility under the provisions hereof, and are not eligible for any other federal and/or state financial assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-21; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-22.
Guardians ad litem.

At any hearing hereunder, the court may appoint guardians ad litem to represent any client in matters of admission or retention under the provisions of this law. It shall be the duty of the guardian ad litem to make an investigation of the facts, and to report the facts to the court with his or her recommendations, if any.

The guardian ad litem shall be paid for his or her services, in an amount to be approved by the court, and the guardian ad litem’s services shall be paid from the estate of the client, or if so ordered by the court, shall be paid by the state and reimbursement shall be had by the state from the estate and assets of the developmentally disabled person in the manner as reimbursement for care and treatment is had by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-22; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-23.
Emergency medical or surgical care.

Whenever it shall be brought to the attention of the person in charge of a facility, that a client who is resident in that facility is in need of emergency medical and/or surgical care and treatment on the written advice of a physician licensed to practice in Rhode Island, and if the client is eighteen (18) years of age or older, the client shall be the sole person able to authorize the treatment in writing. If it shall be brought to the attention of the official in charge of the facility that the client is unable to comprehend or understand the treatment to which he or she is voluntarily consenting, or because of his or her medical condition is not able to voluntarily consent, or in the case of a minor the parents or guardian after due diligence cannot be located, and only in those events shall the official in charge of the facility be authorized to sign a consent to authorize emergency treatment on behalf of the client. The signed consent by the official shall be considered valid, and as if the client shall voluntarily and with full understanding have himself or herself signed the consent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-23; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

40.1-22-24.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-24; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 1995.

40.1-22-25.
Conspiracy to commit person improperly.

Any person who willfully conspires with any other person unlawfully or improperly to cause to be admitted to any facility as developmentally disabled any person who is not developmentally disabled as defined in this chapter shall, on conviction therefor, be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years at the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-25; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 139.

40.1-22-26.
Deprivation of rights.

Any person who willfully withholds from or denies to any person admitted to a facility as defined in §

40.1-22-3

any of his or her rights as granted in this chapter shall, on conviction thereof, be fined not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years at the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-26; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 139.

40.1-22-27.
Disciplinary action against employee.

Any employee of any facility who shall deny to or withhold from any client any right granted him or her by law shall, independently of the criminal sanctions described in §

40.1-22-26

, be subject to such disciplinary action as the director of the facility shall see fit to impose, after notice, a hearing, and a finding of a violation of a right.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-27; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 139.

40.1-22-28.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-28; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-22-29.
Applicability to acts done, rights accrued, or orders prior to enactment of chapter.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall affect or impair the validity of any act done or right accruing, accrued or acquired, or any order, judgment, or status established prior to the enactment thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.1-29; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-22-30 — 40.1-22-38.
[Repealed.]

40.1-22-39.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 31, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 8; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 7; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 3, § 8, effective July 6, 2021.